Missouri, session 2026, SB1485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.2600, to read as
follows:
135.2600. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, no professional sports team that plays its
home games in a facility with a capacity of at least seventy-
five thousand people shall be authorized to receive any tax
credit pursuant to any provision of law.
2. Administering agencies, as such term is defined in
section 135.800, may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking

SB 1485 2
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓